Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.20, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: f. (1) If Except as provided in subparagraph (2), if the vehicle is owned by a nonresident but is subject to issuance of an Iowa certificate of title or registration, the application shall must also contain the full legal name, Iowa driverâs license number or Iowa nonoperatorâs identification card number, date of birth, bona fide residence, and mailing address of the primary user of the vehicle. If the primary user is a firm, association, or corporation, the application shall must contain the bona fide business address and federal employer identification number of the primary user. The primary userâs name and address shall not be printed on the registration receipt or the certificate of title. (2) If the vehicle is owned by a nonresident who owns real property in this state, the vehicle is used primarily at the Iowa property, and the vehicle is subject to issuance of an Iowa certificate of title or registration, the application must include reasonable proof, as determined by the department, that the nonresident owns the property, and may contain the ownerâs driverâs license number or nonoperatorâs identification card number issued by another state in lieu of both the primary Senate File 2189, p. 2 userâs information required under subparagraph (1) and the ownerâs Iowa driverâs license number or Iowa nonoperatorâs identification card number required under paragraph âaâ . The department shall adopt rules regarding acceptable proof of ownership of the property required under this subparagraph. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2189, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor